Hawaii statutes.
§325-33 Performance of vaccination and
immunization. Vaccinations or immunizations required of any person under
this chapter shall be performed by duly licensed physicians or paramedical
personnel under their direction, advanced practice registered nurses, physician
assistants, or by authorized representatives of the department of health. A
record of the immunization shall be maintained by the physician, physician
assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse and shall be available to the
department of education for school entry requirements and the department of
health. [L 1945, c 171, pt of §1; am L 1947, c 165, §1(a); RL 1955, §49-33; am
L 1967, c 23, §3; HRS §325-33; am L 1998, c 60, §6; am L 2009, c 151, §12]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next